Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2510.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.502, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Penalty. A person convicted under subdivision 1, clause (2) or (3), is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. A person convicted under subdivision 1, clause (1), may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than deleted text begin threedeleted text end new text begin 20new text end years or to a payment of a fine of not more than deleted text begin $5,000deleted text end new text begin $20,000new text end or both. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end